Tables/Contraction/si.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2015 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://mielke.cc/brltty/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Table - Sinhalese (uncontracted)
#
# Samuel Thibault <samuel.thibault@ens-lyon.org>
# 
# This table is based on the Unesco report on the progress of unification of
# braille writing « L'ÉCRITURE BRAILLE DANS LE MONDE », by Sir Clutha
# MACKENZIE: http://unesdoc.unesco.org/images/0013/001352/135251fo.pdf
# The document is dated 1954, so this table may be quite outdated.

always අ 1	  SINHALA LETTER AYANNA
always ආ 345	  SINHALA LETTER AAYANNA
always ඇ 12356	  SINHALA LETTER AEYANNA
always ඈ 12456	  SINHALA LETTER AEEYANNA
always ඉ 24	  SINHALA LETTER IYANNA
always ඊ 35	  SINHALA LETTER IIYANNA
always උ 136	  SINHALA LETTER UYANNA
always ඌ 1256	  SINHALA LETTER UUYANNA
always ඍ 5-1235	  SINHALA LETTER IRUYANNA
always ඎ 6-1235	  SINHALA LETTER IRUUYANNA
always ඏ 5-123	  SINHALA LETTER ILUYANNA
always ඐ 6-123	  SINHALA LETTER ILUUYANNA
always එ 15	  SINHALA LETTER EYANNA
always ඒ 26	  SINHALA LETTER EEYANNA
always ඓ 34	  SINHALA LETTER AIYANNA
always ඔ 135	  SINHALA LETTER OYANNA
always ඕ 1346	  SINHALA LETTER OOYANNA
always ඖ 246	  SINHALA LETTER AUYANNA
always ක 13	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA KAYANNA
always ඛ 46	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA KAYANNA
always ග 1245	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA GAYANNA
always ඝ 126	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA GAYANNA
always ඞ 346	  SINHALA LETTER KANTAJA NAASIKYAYA
always ච 14	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA CAYANNA
always ඡ 16	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA CAYANNA
always ජ 245	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA JAYANNA
always ඣ 356	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA JAYANNA
always ඤ 25	  SINHALA LETTER TAALUJA NAASIKYAYA
always ට 23456	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA TTAYANNA
always ඨ 2456	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA TTAYANNA
always ඩ 1246	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA DDAYANNA
always ඪ 123456	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA DDAYANNA
always ණ 3456	  SINHALA LETTER MUURDHAJA NAYANNA
always ත 2345	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA TAYANNA
always ථ 1456	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA TAYANNA
always ද 145	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA DAYANNA
always ධ 2346	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA DAYANNA
always න 1345	  SINHALA LETTER DANTAJA NAYANNA
always ප 1234	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA PAYANNA
always ඵ 235	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA PAYANNA
always බ 12	  SINHALA LETTER ALPAPRAANA BAYANNA
always භ 45	  SINHALA LETTER MAHAAPRAANA BAYANNA
always ම 134	  SINHALA LETTER MAYANNA
always ඹ 56	  SINHALA LETTER AMBA BAYANNA
always ය 13456	  SINHALA LETTER YAYANNA
always ර 1235	  SINHALA LETTER RAYANNA
always ල 123	  SINHALA LETTER DANTAJA LAYANNA
always ව 1236	  SINHALA LETTER VAYANNA
always ශ 12346	  SINHALA LETTER TAALUJA SAYANNA
always ෂ 146	  SINHALA LETTER MUURDHAJA SAYANNA
always ස 234	  SINHALA LETTER DANTAJA SAYANNA
always හ 125	  SINHALA LETTER HAYANNA
always ළ 456	  SINHALA LETTER MUURDHAJA LAYANNA
always ෆ 124	  SINHALA LETTER FAYANNA
